Washington statutes.
RCW 43.15.095

Legislative youth advisory council.

(1) The legislative youth advisory council is established to examine issues of importance to youth, including but not limited to education, employment, strategies to increase youth participation in state and municipal government, safe environments for youth, substance abuse, emotional and physical health, foster care, poverty, homelessness, and youth access to services on a statewide and municipal basis.

(2) The council consists of at least twenty-two members as provided in this subsection who, at the time of appointment, are aged fourteen to eighteen. The council shall select a chair from among its members.

(3) Members shall serve two-year terms and, if eligible, may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms.

(4)(a) Students may apply annually to be considered for participation in the program by completing an online application form and submitting the application to the legislative youth advisory council. The council may develop selection criteria and an application review process. The council shall recommend candidates whose names will be submitted to the office of the lieutenant governor for final selection. The office of the lieutenant governor shall notify all applicants of the final selections.

(b) The office of the lieutenant governor shall make the application available on the lieutenant governor's website.

(5) Subject to the supervision of the office of the lieutenant governor, the council shall have the following duties:

(a) Advising the legislature on proposed and pending legislation, including state budget expenditures and policy matters relating to youth;

(b) Advising the standing committees of the legislature and study commissions, committees, and task forces regarding issues relating to youth;

(c) Conducting periodic seminars for its members regarding leadership, government, and the legislature;

(d) Accepting and soliciting for grants and donations from public and private sources to support the activities of the council; and

(e) Reporting annually by December 1st to the legislature on its activities, including proposed legislation that implements recommendations of the council.

(6) In carrying out its duties under this section, the council must meet at least three times per year. The council is encouraged to use technology, such as remote videoconferencing technology, to facilitate members' participation in meetings. The council is encouraged to invite local state legislators to participate in the meetings. The council is encouraged to poll other students in order to get a broad perspective on various policy issues. The council is encouraged to use technology to conduct polling.

(7) Members may be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8) The office of the lieutenant governor shall provide administration, supervision, and facilitation support to the council. In facilitating the program, the office of the lieutenant governor may collaborate with the Washington state leadership board established in RCW 43.388.010. The senate and house of representatives may provide policy and fiscal briefings and assistance with drafting proposed legislation. The senate and the house of representatives shall each develop internal policies relating to staff assistance provided to the council. Such policies may include applicable internal personnel and practices guidelines, resource use and expense reimbursement guidelines, and applicable ethics mandates. Provision of funds, resources, and staff, as well as the assignment and direction of staff, remains at all times within the sole discretion of the chamber making the provision.

(9) The office of the lieutenant governor, the legislature, any agency of the legislature, and any official or employee of such office or agency are immune from liability for any injury that is incurred by or caused by a member of the legislative youth advisory council and that occurs while the member of the council is performing duties of the council or is otherwise engaged in activities or receiving services for which reimbursement is allowed under subsection (7) of this section. The immunity provided by this subsection does not apply to an injury intentionally caused by the act or omission of an employee or official of the office of the lieutenant governor, the legislature, or any agency of the legislature.

[ 2022 c 96 s 6; 2020 c 114 s 23; 2009 c 410 s 1; 2007 c 291 s 2; 2005 c 355 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.300.801.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2022 c 96: See notes following RCW 43.388.010.

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.

Effective date—2009 c 410: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 7, 2009]." [ 2009 c 410 s 2.]

Finding—2007 c 291: "The legislature finds that the legislative youth advisory council provides a unique opportunity for middle and high school students to be actively involved in government. Councilmembers not only learn about, but exercise, the core values and democratic principles of our state and nation, along with the rights and responsibilities of citizenship and democratic civic involvement. As such, they are engaged in authentic practice of the essential academic learning requirements in civics. In the short time since its creation, the legislative youth advisory council has studied, debated, and begun to formulate positions and recommendations on such important topics as education reform, school finance, public school learning environments, health and fitness education, and standardized testing. The legislature continues to stress the importance of civics education and support the type of civic involvement by students exemplified by the legislative youth advisory council." [ 2007 c 291 s 1.]

Effective date—2007 c 291: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 2, 2007]." [ 2007 c 291 s 4.]